Hawaii statutes.
PART
VIII. SENTENCES

[§124A-81] Cruel and unusual punishments
prohibited. Cruel or unusual punishment may not be adjudged by any
court-martial or inflicted upon any person subject to this chapter. The use of
irons, single or double, except for the purpose of safe custody, is prohibited.
[L 1982, c 171, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next